intl/locales/ml/hyphenation/hyph_ml.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2‍2
1‌1
1അ1
1ആ1
1ഇ1
1ഈ1
1ഉ1
1ഊ1
1ഋ1
1ൠ1
1ഌ1
1ൡ1
1എ1
1ഏ1
1ഐ1
1ഒ1
1ഓ1
1ഔ1
ാ1
ി1
ീ1
ു1
ൂ1
ൃ1
െ1
േ1
ൈ1
ൊ1
ോ1
ൌ1
ൗ1
1ക
1ഖ
1ഗ
1ഘ
1ങ
1ച
1ഛ
1ജ
1ഝ
1ഞ
1ട
1ഠ
1ഡ
1ഢ
1ണ
1ത
1ഥ
1ദ
1ധ
1ന
1പ
1ഫ
1ബ
1ഭ
1മ
1യ
1ര
1റ
1ല
1ള
1ഴ
1വ
1ശ
1ഷ
1സ
1ഹ
2ഃ1
2ം1
2്2
ന്2
ര്2
ള്2
ല്2
ക്2
ണ്2
2ന്‍
2ല്‍
2ള്‍
2ണ്‍
2ര്‍
2ക്‍
2ൺ
2ൻ
2ർ
2ൽ
2ൾ
2ൿ
